Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1306
Federal aid; political subdivisions; department; agreements; unused funds; allocation.

Any political or governmental subdivision or any public corporation of this state shall have the authority to enter into agreements with the federal government through or with the department to enable them to participate in all the benefits to be secured from federal-aid funds, or funds made available from the federal government to be used on roads and streets. The department may negotiate and enter into agreements with the federal government, or any of its constituted agencies, and take all steps and proceedings necessary in order to secure such benefits for such political or governmental subdivisions or public corporations.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 6, p. 420;

Laws 1967, c. 237, § 1, p. 635;

Laws 1969, c. 330, § 1, p. 1185.

First class city could contract with Department of Roads to prohibit parking on designated street within city. Vap v. City of McCook, 178 Neb. 844, 136 N.W.2d 220 (1965).